Washington statutes.
RCW 2.32.240

Transcript of testimony—Fee—Forma pauperis.

When a record has been taken in any cause as provided in RCW 2.32.180 through 2.32.310, if the court, or either party to the suit or action, or his or her attorney, request a transcript, the official reporter employed by the court or other certified court reporter, or an authorized transcriptionist, shall make, or cause to be made, with reasonable diligence, full and accurate transcript of the testimony and other proceedings, which shall, when certified to as hereinafter provided, be filed with the clerk of the court where such trial is had for the use of the court or parties to the action, except for transcripts requested for an appellate case. The fees of the official reporter employed by the court or other certified court reporter, or authorized transcriptionist, as defined by supreme court rule, for making such transcript shall be fixed in accordance with costs as allowed in cost bills in civil cases by the supreme court of the state of Washington, and when such transcript is ordered by any party to any suit or action, said fee shall be paid forthwith by the party ordering the same, and in all cases where a transcript is made as provided for under the provisions of RCW 2.32.180 through 2.32.310 the cost thereof shall be taxable as costs in the case, and shall be so taxed as other costs in the case are taxed: PROVIDED, That when a party has been judicially determined to have a constitutional right to a transcript and to be unable by reason of poverty to pay for such transcript, the court may order said transcript to be made by the official reporter employed by the court or other certified court reporter, or an authorized transcriptionist, which transcript fee therefor shall be paid by the state upon submission of appropriate vouchers to the clerk of the supreme court.

[ 2016 c 74 s 1; 2011 c 336 s 54; 1983 c 3 s 2; 1975 1st ex.s. c 261 s 1; 1972 ex.s. c 111 s 1; 1970 ex.s. c 31 s 1; 1965 c 133 s 3; 1957 c 244 s 4; 1943 c 69 s 4; 1913 c 126 s 5; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 42-5.]

NOTES:

Severability—1965 c 133: "If any provision of this act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1965 c 133 s 4.]

Indigent party—State to pay costs and fees incident to review by supreme court or court of appeals: RCW 4.88.330.